Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF263.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 2629XS (2) 91 je/js S.F. 263 DIVISION I 1 PUBLIC EMPLOYEE COLLECTIVE BARGAINING 2 Section 1. Section 20.3, subsections 11 and 13, Code 2025, 3 are amended by striking the subsections. 4 Sec. 2. Section 20.6, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 5 to read as follows: 6 1. Administer Interpret, apply, and administer the 7 provisions of this chapter and delegate the powers and duties 8 of the board to persons employed by the board, as appropriate. 9 Sec. 3. Section 20.6, subsections 6 and 7, Code 2025, are 10 amended by striking the subsections. 11 Sec. 4. Section 20.7, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 12 to read as follows: 13 2. Hire, evaluate, promote, demote, transfer, assign, and 14 retain public employees in positions within the public agency. 15 Sec. 5. Section 20.8, subsection 5, Code 2025, is amended by 16 striking the subsection. 17 Sec. 6. Section 20.9, Code 2025, is amended by striking the 18 section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 19 20.9 Scope of negotiations. 20 1. The public employer and the employee organization 21 shall meet at reasonable times, including meetings reasonably 22 in advance of the public employerâs budget-making process, 23 to negotiate in good faith with respect to wages, hours, 24 vacations, insurance, holidays, leaves of absence, shift 25 differentials, overtime compensation, supplemental pay, 26 seniority, transfer procedures, job classifications, health and 27 safety matters, evaluation procedures, procedures for staff 28 reduction, in-service training, and other matters mutually 29 agreed upon. Negotiations shall also include terms authorizing 30 dues checkoff for members of the employee organization and 31 grievance procedures for resolving any questions arising under 32 the agreement, which shall be embodied in a written agreement 33 and signed by the parties. If an agreement provides for dues 34 checkoff, a memberâs dues may be checked off only upon the 35 -1- LSB 2629XS (2) 91 je/js 1/ 48 S.F. 263 memberâs written request and the member may terminate the dues 1 checkoff at any time by giving thirty daysâ written notice. 2 Such obligation to negotiate in good faith does not compel 3 either party to agree to a proposal or make a concession. 4 2. Nothing in this section shall diminish the authority 5 and power of the department of administrative services, board 6 of regentsâ merit system, Iowa public broadcasting boardâs 7 merit system, or any civil service commission established by 8 constitutional provision, statute, charter, or special act to 9 recruit employees, prepare, conduct and grade examinations, 10 rate candidates in order of their relative scores for 11 certification for appointment or promotion or for other matters 12 of classification, reclassification, or appeal rights in the 13 classified service of the public employer served. 14 3. All retirement systems shall be excluded from the scope 15 of negotiations. 16 Sec. 7. Section 20.10, subsection 3, paragraph j, Code 2025, 17 is amended by striking the paragraph. 18 Sec. 8. Section 20.12, subsection 5, Code 2025, is amended 19 to read as follows: 20 5. If an employee organization or any of its officers 21 is held to be in contempt of court for failure to comply 22 with an injunction pursuant to this section , or is convicted 23 of violating this section , the employee organization shall 24 be immediately decertified, shall cease to represent the 25 bargaining unit, shall cease to receive any dues by checkoff, 26 and may again be certified only after twenty-four twelve months 27 have elapsed from the effective date of decertification and 28 only if after a new petition for certification pursuant to 29 compliance with section 20.14 is filed and a new certification 30 election pursuant to section 20.15 is held . The penalties 31 provided in this section may be suspended or modified by the 32 court, but only upon request of the public employer and only 33 if the court determines the suspension or modification is in 34 the public interest. 35 -2- LSB 2629XS (2) 91 je/js 2/ 48 S.F. 263 Sec. 9. Section 20.15, Code 2025, is amended by striking the 1 section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 2 20.15 Elections. 3 1. Upon the filing of a petition for certification of an 4 employee organization, the board shall submit a question to 5 the public employees at an election in the bargaining unit 6 found appropriate by the board. The question on the ballot 7 shall permit the public employees to vote for no bargaining 8 representation or for any employee organization which has 9 petitioned for certification or which has presented proof 10 satisfactory to the board of support of ten percent or more of 11 the public employees in the appropriate unit. 12 2. If a majority of the votes cast on the question is 13 for no bargaining representation, the public employees in 14 the bargaining unit found appropriate by the board shall not 15 be represented by an employee organization. If a majority 16 of the votes cast on the question is for a listed employee 17 organization, then that employee organization shall represent 18 the public employees in the bargaining unit found appropriate 19 by the board. 20 3. If none of the choices on the ballot receive the vote 21 of a majority of the public employees voting, the board shall 22 conduct a runoff election among the two choices receiving the 23 greatest number of votes. 24 4. Upon written objections filed by any party to the 25 election within ten days after notice of the results of 26 the election, if the board finds that misconduct or other 27 circumstances prevented the public employees eligible to 28 vote from freely expressing their preferences, the board may 29 invalidate the election and hold a second election for the 30 public employees. 31 5. Upon completion of a valid election in which the majority 32 choice of the employees voting is determined, the board shall 33 certify the results of the election and shall give reasonable 34 notice of the order to all employee organizations listed on the 35 -3- LSB 2629XS (2) 91 je/js 3/ 48 S.F. 263 ballot, the public employers, and the public employees in the 1 appropriate bargaining unit. 2 6. a. A petition for certification as exclusive bargaining 3 representative of a bargaining unit shall not be considered 4 by the board for a period of one year from the date of the 5 noncertification of an employee organization as the exclusive 6 bargaining representative of that bargaining unit following a 7 certification election. A petition for certification as the 8 exclusive bargaining representative of a bargaining unit shall 9 also not be considered by the board if the bargaining unit is 10 at that time represented by a certified exclusive bargaining 11 representative. 12 b. A petition for the decertification of the exclusive 13 bargaining representative of a bargaining unit shall not be 14 considered by the board for a period of one year from the date 15 of its certification, or within one year of its continued 16 certification following a decertification election, or during 17 the duration of a collective bargaining agreement which, for 18 purposes of this section, shall be deemed not to exceed two 19 years. However, if a petition for decertification is filed 20 during the duration of a collective bargaining agreement, the 21 board shall award an election under this section not more than 22 one hundred eighty days and not less than one hundred fifty 23 days prior to the expiration of the collective bargaining 24 agreement. If an employee organization is decertified, the 25 board may receive petitions under section 20.14, provided that 26 no such petition and no election conducted pursuant to such 27 petition within one year from decertification shall include as 28 a party the decertified employee organization. 29 c. A collective bargaining agreement with the state, its 30 boards, commissions, departments, and agencies shall be for two 31 years. The provisions of a collective bargaining agreement or 32 arbitratorâs award affecting state employees shall not provide 33 for renegotiations which would require the refinancing of 34 salary and fringe benefits for the second year of the term of 35 -4- LSB 2629XS (2) 91 je/js 4/ 48 S.F. 263 the agreement, except as provided in section 20.17, subsection 1 6. The effective date of any such agreement shall be July 1 of 2 odd-numbered years, provided that if an exclusive bargaining 3 representative is certified on a date which will prevent the 4 negotiation of a collective bargaining agreement prior to 5 July 1 of odd-numbered years for a period of two years, the 6 certified collective bargaining representative may negotiate 7 a one-year contract with the public employer which shall be 8 effective from July 1 of the even-numbered year to July 1 9 of the succeeding odd-numbered year when new contracts shall 10 become effective. 11 Sec. 10. Section 20.17, subsection 8, Code 2025, is amended 12 by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu thereof the 13 following: 14 8. The salaries of all public employees of the state under 15 a merit system and all other fringe benefits which are granted 16 to all public employees of the state shall be negotiated with 17 the governor or the governorâs designee on a statewide basis, 18 except those benefits which are not subject to negotiations 19 pursuant to the provisions of section 20.9. 20 Sec. 11. Section 20.17, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 21 following new subsection: 22 NEW SUBSECTION . 8A. A public employee or any employee 23 organization shall not negotiate or attempt to negotiate 24 directly with a member of the governing board of a public 25 employer if the public employer has appointed or authorized 26 a bargaining representative for the purpose of bargaining 27 with the public employees or their representative, unless the 28 member of the governing board is the designated bargaining 29 representative of the public employer. 30 Sec. 12. Section 20.22, subsections 2, 3, 7, 9, and 10, Code 31 2025, are amended to read as follows: 32 2. Each party shall serve its final offer on each of 33 the impasse items upon the other party within four days of 34 the boardâs receipt of the request for arbitration , or by a 35 -5- LSB 2629XS (2) 91 je/js 5/ 48 S.F. 263 deadline otherwise agreed upon by the parties . The parties may 1 continue to negotiate all offers until an agreement is reached 2 or an award is rendered by the arbitrator. The full costs of 3 arbitration under this section shall be shared equally by the 4 parties to the dispute. 5 3. The submission of the impasse items to the arbitrator 6 shall be limited to those items upon which the parties have 7 not reached agreement. With respect to each such item, the 8 arbitratorâs award shall be restricted to the final offers on 9 each impasse item submitted by the parties to the arbitrator , 10 except as provided in subsection 10 , paragraph âbâ . 11 7. For an arbitration involving a bargaining unit that 12 has at least thirty percent of members who are public safety 13 employees, the The arbitrator shall consider and specifically 14 address in the arbitratorâs determination , in addition to any 15 other relevant factors, the following factors: 16 a. Past collective bargaining contracts between the parties 17 including the bargaining that led up to such contracts. 18 b. Comparison of wages, hours, and conditions of employment 19 of the involved public employees with those of other public 20 employees doing comparable work, giving consideration to 21 factors peculiar to the area and the classifications involved. 22 c. The interests and welfare of the public, the ability of 23 the public employer to finance economic adjustments, and the 24 effect of such adjustments on the normal standard of services. 25 d. The power of the public employer to levy taxes and 26 appropriate funds for the conduct of its operations. 27 9. a. The arbitrator may administer oaths, examine 28 witnesses and documents, take testimony and receive evidence, 29 and issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses and 30 the production of records. The arbitrator may petition the 31 district court at the seat of government or of the county 32 in which the hearing is held to enforce the order of the 33 arbitrator compelling the attendance of witnesses and the 34 production of records. 35 -6- LSB 2629XS (2) 91 je/js 6/ 48 S.F. 263 b. Except as required for purposes of the consideration of 1 the factors specified in subsection 7 , paragraphs âaâ through 2 âcâ , and subsection 8 , paragraph âaâ , subparagraphs (1) through 3 (3), the parties shall not introduce, and the arbitrator 4 shall not accept or consider, any direct or indirect evidence 5 regarding any subject excluded from negotiations pursuant to 6 section 20.9 . 7 10. a. The arbitrator shall select within fifteen 8 days after the hearing the most reasonable offer, in the 9 arbitratorâs judgment, of the final offers on each impasse item 10 submitted by the parties. 11 b. (1) However, for an arbitration involving a bargaining 12 unit that does not have at least thirty percent of members who 13 are public safety employees, with respect to any increase in 14 base wages, the arbitratorâs award shall not exceed the lesser 15 of the following percentages in any one-year period in the 16 duration of the bargaining agreement: 17 (a) Three percent. 18 (b) A percentage equal to the increase in the consumer 19 price index for all urban consumers for the midwest region, 20 if any, as determined by the United States department of 21 labor, bureau of labor statistics, or a successor index. Such 22 percentage shall be the change in the consumer price index 23 for the twelve-month period beginning eighteen months prior 24 to the month in which the impasse item regarding base wages 25 was submitted to the arbitrator and ending six months prior to 26 the month in which the impasse item regarding base wages was 27 submitted to the arbitrator. 28 (2) To assist the parties in the preparation of their final 29 offers on an impasse item regarding base wages, the board 30 shall provide information to the parties regarding the change 31 in the consumer price index for all urban consumers for the 32 midwest region for any twelve-month period. The department of 33 workforce development shall assist the board in preparing such 34 information upon request. 35 -7- LSB 2629XS (2) 91 je/js 7/ 48 S.F. 263 Sec. 13. Section 20.22, subsection 8, Code 2025, is amended 1 by striking the subsection. 2 Sec. 14. Section 20.26, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 4. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit 5 voluntary contributions by individuals to political parties 6 or candidates , provided that such contributions are not made 7 through payroll deductions . 8 Sec. 15. Section 20.29, Code 2025, is amended to read as 9 follows: 10 20.29 Filing agreement ââ public access ââ internet site . 11 1. Collective bargaining agreements shall be in writing and 12 shall be signed by the parties. 13 2. A copy of a collective bargaining agreement entered into 14 between a public employer and a certified employee organization 15 and made final under this chapter shall be filed with the board 16 by the public employer within ten days of the date on which the 17 agreement is entered into. 18 3. Copies of collective bargaining agreements entered 19 into between the state and the state employeesâ bargaining 20 representatives and made final under this chapter shall be 21 filed with the secretary of state and be made available to the 22 public at cost. 23 4. The board shall maintain an internet site that allows 24 searchable access to a database of collective bargaining 25 agreements and other collective bargaining information. 26 Sec. 16. Section 20.30, Code 2025, is amended by striking 27 the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 28 20.30 Supervisory member ââ no reduction before retirement. 29 1. A supervisory member of any department or agency 30 employed by the state of Iowa shall not be granted a voluntary 31 reduction to a nonsupervisory rank or grade during the six 32 months preceding retirement of the member. A member of any 33 department or agency employed by the state of Iowa who retires 34 in less than six months after voluntarily requesting and 35 -8- LSB 2629XS (2) 91 je/js 8/ 48 S.F. 263 receiving a reduction in rank or grade from a supervisory to a 1 nonsupervisory position shall be ineligible for a benefit to 2 which the member is entitled as a nonsupervisory member but is 3 not entitled as a supervisory member. 4 2. The provisions of this section shall be effective during 5 the collective bargaining agreement in effect from July 1, 6 1979, to June 30, 1981. 7 Sec. 17. Section 20.31, subsection 2, unnumbered paragraph 8 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 9 A mediator shall not be required to testify in any judicial, 10 administrative, arbitration, or grievance proceeding regarding 11 any matters occurring in the course of a mediation, including 12 any verbal or written communication or behavior, other than 13 facts relating exclusively to the timing or scheduling of 14 mediation. A mediator shall not be required to produce or 15 disclose any documents, including notes, memoranda, or other 16 work product, relating to mediation, other than documents 17 relating exclusively to the timing or scheduling of mediation. 18 This subsection shall not apply in any of the following 19 circumstances: 20 Sec. 18. Section 22.7, subsection 69, Code 2025, is amended 21 to read as follows: 22 69. The evidence of public employee support for 23 the certification , retention and recertification, or 24 decertification of an employee organization as defined in 25 section 20.3 that is submitted to the employment appeal board 26 as provided in section 20.14 or 20.15 . 27 Sec. 19. Section 22.7, subsection 70, Code 2025, is amended 28 by striking the subsection. 29 Sec. 20. Section 70A.17A, Code 2025, is amended by adding 30 the following new subsection: 31 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. This section shall not affect a payroll 32 deduction elected by a state employee pursuant to section 33 70A.19. 34 Sec. 21. Section 70A.19, Code 2025, is amended by striking 35 -9- LSB 2629XS (2) 91 je/js 9/ 48 S.F. 263 the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 1 70A.19 Duration of state payroll deduction for dues of 2 employee organization member. 3 A state employee who elects a payroll deduction for 4 membership dues to an employee organization pursuant to the 5 provisions of a collective bargaining agreement negotiated 6 under the provisions of chapter 20 shall maintain the deduction 7 for a period of one year or until the expiration of the 8 collective bargaining agreement, whichever occurs first. A 9 state employee who transfers employment to a position covered 10 by a different collective bargaining agreement or who becomes 11 a management employee is not subject to this requirement. 12 With respect to state employees, this section supersedes the 13 provisions of section 20.9 allowing termination of a dues 14 checkoff at any time but does not supersede the requirement for 15 thirty daysâ written notice of termination. 16 Sec. 22. Section 412.2, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 17 to read as follows: 18 1. From the proceeds of the assessments on the wages 19 and salaries of employees, of any such waterworks system, 20 or other municipally owned and operated public utility, 21 eligible to receive the benefits thereof. Notwithstanding 22 any provisions of section 20.9 to the contrary, a council, 23 board of waterworks, or other board or commission which 24 establishes a pension and annuity retirement system pursuant to 25 this chapter, shall negotiate in good faith with a certified 26 employee organization as defined in section 20.3, which is the 27 collective bargaining representative of the employees, with 28 respect to the amount or rate of the assessment on the wages 29 and salaries of employees and the method or methods for payment 30 of the assessment by the employees. 31 Sec. 23. Section 602.1401, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 32 2025, is amended to read as follows: 33 b. For purposes of chapter 20 , the certified representative, 34 which on July 1, 1983, represents employees who become judicial 35 -10- LSB 2629XS (2) 91 je/js 10/ 48 S.F. 263 branch employees as a result of 1983 Iowa Acts, ch. 186 , shall 1 remain the certified representative when the employees become 2 judicial branch employees and thereafter, unless the public 3 employee organization is not retained and recertified or is 4 decertified in an election held under section 20.15 or amended 5 or absorbed into another certified organization pursuant to 6 chapter 20 . Collective bargaining negotiations shall be 7 conducted on a statewide basis and the certified employee 8 organizations which engage in bargaining shall negotiate on a 9 statewide basis, although bargaining units shall be organized 10 by judicial district. The employment appeal board shall adopt 11 rules pursuant to chapter 17A to implement this subsection . 12 Sec. 24. REPEAL. Sections 20.32 and 20.33, Code 2025, are 13 repealed. 14 Sec. 25. TRANSITION PROCEDURES ââ DEADLINE ââ EMERGENCY 15 RULES. 16 1. As of the effective date of this division of this Act, 17 parties, mediators, and arbitrators engaging in any collective 18 bargaining procedures provided for in chapter 20, Code 2025, 19 who have not, before the effective date of this division 20 of this Act, completed such procedures, shall immediately 21 terminate any such procedures in process. A collective 22 bargaining agreement negotiated pursuant to such procedures in 23 process shall not become effective. Parties, mediators, and 24 arbitrators shall not engage in further collective bargaining 25 procedures except as provided in this section. Such parties 26 shall commence collective bargaining in accordance with section 27 20.17, as amended in this division of this Act. Such parties 28 shall complete such bargaining not later than June 30, 2025, 29 unless the parties mutually agree to a different deadline. 30 2. The employment appeal board shall adopt emergency 31 rules under section 17A.4, subsection 3, and section 17A.5, 32 subsection 2, paragraph âbâ, to provide for procedures as 33 deemed necessary to implement the provisions of this section 34 within five business days of the effective date of this 35 -11- LSB 2629XS (2) 91 je/js 11/ 48 S.F. 263 Act and shall submit such rules to the administrative rules 1 coordinator and the administrative code editor pursuant to 2 section 17A.5, subsection 1, within the same period. The rules 3 shall be effective immediately upon filing unless a later date 4 is specified in the rules. Such rules shall include but are 5 not limited to alternative deadlines for completion of the 6 procedures provided in sections 20.17 and 20.22, as amended by 7 this division of this Act, and sections 20.19 and 20.20, which 8 deadlines may be waived by mutual agreement of the parties. 9 3. The department of administrative services shall adopt 10 emergency rules under section 17A.4, subsection 3, and 11 section 17A.5, subsection 2, paragraph âbâ, to provide for the 12 implementation of section 70A.19, as amended by this division 13 of this Act within five business days of the effective date 14 of this Act and shall submit such rules to the administrative 15 rules coordinator and the administrative code editor pursuant 16 to section 17A.5, subsection 1, within the same period. The 17 rules shall be effective immediately upon filing unless a later 18 date is specified in the rules. 19 Sec. 26. ELECTIONS ââ DIRECTIVES TO EMPLOYMENT APPEAL 20 BOARD. 21 1. The employment appeal board shall cancel any elections 22 scheduled or in process pursuant to section 20.15, subsection 23 2, Code 2025, as of the effective date of this Act. 24 2. Notwithstanding section 20.15, subsection 1, paragraph 25 âcâ, Code 2025, the employment appeal board shall consider a 26 petition for certification of an employee organization as the 27 exclusive representative of a bargaining unit for which an 28 employee organization was not retained and recertified as the 29 exclusive representative of that bargaining unit regardless of 30 the amount of time that has elapsed since the retention and 31 recertification election at which an employee organization was 32 not retained or recertified. 33 Sec. 27. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 34 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 35 -12- LSB 2629XS (2) 91 je/js 12/ 48 S.F. 263 Sec. 28. APPLICABILITY. With the exception of the 1 section of this division of this Act amending section 20.6, 2 subsection 1, this division of this Act does not apply to 3 collective bargaining agreements which have been ratified in a 4 ratification election referred to in section 20.17, subsection 5 4, for which an arbitrator has made a final determination as 6 described in section 20.22, subsection 11, or which have become 7 effective, when such events occurred before the effective 8 date of this division of this Act. This division of this Act 9 applies to all collective bargaining procedures provided for in 10 chapter 20 occurring on and after the effective date of this 11 division of this Act and collective bargaining agreements for 12 which a ratification election referred to in section 20.17, 13 subsection 4, is held, for which an arbitrator makes a final 14 determination as described in section 20.22, subsection 11, or 15 which become effective on or after the effective date of this 16 division of this Act. 17 DIVISION II 18 EDUCATOR EMPLOYMENT MATTERS 19 Sec. 29. Section 279.13, subsections 2 and 5, Code 2025, are 20 amended to read as follows: 21 2. The contract shall remain in force and effect for the 22 period stated in the contract and shall be automatically 23 continued for equivalent periods except as modified or 24 terminated by mutual agreement of the board of directors and 25 the teacher or as modified or terminated in accordance with 26 the provisions specified in this chapter . A contract shall 27 not be offered by the employing board to a teacher under its 28 jurisdiction prior to March 15 of any year. A teacher who has 29 not accepted a contract for the ensuing school year tendered 30 by the employing board may resign effective at the end of the 31 current school year by filing a written resignation with the 32 secretary of the board. The resignation must be filed not 33 later than the last day of the current school year or the date 34 specified by the employing board for return of the contract, 35 -13- LSB 2629XS (2) 91 je/js 13/ 48 S.F. 263 whichever date occurs first. However, a teacher shall not be 1 required to return a contract to the board or to resign less 2 than twenty-one days after the contract has been offered. 3 5. Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section , a 4 temporary contract may be issued to a teacher for a period of 5 up to six months. Notwithstanding the other provisions of this 6 section , a temporary contract may also be issued to a teacher 7 to fill a vacancy created by a leave of absence in accordance 8 with the provisions of section 29A.28 , which contract shall 9 automatically terminate upon return from military leave of the 10 former incumbent of the teaching position . Temporary contracts 11 and which contract shall not be subject to the provisions of 12 sections 279.15 through 279.19 , or section 279.27 . A separate 13 extracurricular contract issued pursuant to section 279.19A to 14 a person issued a temporary contract under this section shall 15 automatically terminate with the termination of the temporary 16 contract as required under section 279.19A, subsection 8 . 17 Sec. 30. Section 279.13, subsection 4, unnumbered paragraph 18 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 19 For purposes of this section , sections 279.14 , 279.15 , 20 279.16 through 279.17 , 279.19 , and 279.27 , unless the context 21 otherwise requires, âteacherâ includes the following individuals 22 employed by a community college: 23 Sec. 31. Section 279.14, Code 2025, is amended to read as 24 follows: 25 279.14 Evaluation criteria and procedures. 26 1. The board shall establish evaluation criteria and shall 27 implement evaluation procedures. If an exclusive bargaining 28 representative has been certified, the board shall negotiate 29 in good faith with respect to evaluation procedures pursuant 30 to chapter 20. 31 2. The determination of standards of performance expected 32 of school district personnel shall be reserved as an exclusive 33 management right of the school board and shall not be subject 34 to mandatory negotiations under chapter 20 . Objections 35 -14- LSB 2629XS (2) 91 je/js 14/ 48 S.F. 263 Notwithstanding chapter 20, objections to the procedures, 1 use, or content of an evaluation in a teacher termination 2 proceeding brought before the school board in a hearing held in 3 accordance with section 279.16 or 279.27 shall not be subject 4 to any the grievance procedures negotiated in accordance with 5 chapter 20 . A school district shall not be obligated to 6 process any evaluation grievance after service of a notice and 7 recommendation to terminate an individualâs continuing teaching 8 contract in accordance with this chapter. 9 Sec. 32. Section 279.15, subsection 2, paragraph c, Code 10 2025, is amended to read as follows: 11 c. Within five days of the receipt of the written notice 12 that the superintendent is recommending termination of the 13 contract, the teacher may request, in writing to the secretary 14 of the board, a private hearing with the board. The private 15 hearing shall not be subject to chapter 21 and shall be held 16 no sooner than twenty ten days and no later than forty twenty 17 days following the receipt of the request unless the parties 18 otherwise agree. The secretary of the board shall notify the 19 teacher in writing of the date, time, and location of the 20 private hearing, and at least ten five days before the hearing 21 shall also furnish to the teacher any documentation which 22 may be presented to the board at the private hearing and a 23 list of persons who may address the board in support of the 24 superintendentâs recommendation at the private hearing. At 25 least seven three days before the hearing, the teacher shall 26 provide any documentation the teacher expects to present at 27 the private hearing, along with the names of any persons who 28 may address the board on behalf of the teacher. This exchange 29 of information shall be at the time specified unless otherwise 30 agreed. 31 Sec. 33. Section 279.16, Code 2025, is amended by striking 32 the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 33 279.16 Private hearing ââ decision ââ record. 34 1. The participants at the private hearing shall be 35 -15- LSB 2629XS (2) 91 je/js 15/ 48 S.F. 263 at least a majority of the members of the board, their 1 legal representatives, if any, the superintendent, the 2 superintendentâs designated representatives, if any, the 3 teacherâs immediate supervisor, the teacher, the teacherâs 4 representatives, if any, and the witnesses for the parties. 5 The evidence at the private hearing shall be limited to the 6 specific reasons stated in the superintendentâs notice of 7 recommendation of termination. No participant in the hearing 8 shall be liable for any damages to any person if any statement 9 at the hearing is determined to be erroneous as long as the 10 statement was made in good faith. The superintendent shall 11 present evidence and argument on all issues involved and 12 the teacher may cross-examine, respond and present evidence 13 and argument in the teacherâs behalf relevant to all issues 14 involved. Evidence may be by stipulation of the parties and 15 informal settlement may be made by stipulation, consent, or 16 default or by any other method agreed upon by the parties in 17 writing. The board shall employ a certified shorthand reporter 18 to keep a record of the private hearing. The proceedings 19 or any part thereof shall be transcribed at the request of 20 either party with the expense of transcription charged to the 21 requesting party. 22 2. The presiding officer of the board may administer oaths 23 in the same manner and with like effect and under the same 24 penalties as in the case of magistrates exercising criminal 25 or civil jurisdiction. The board shall cause subpoenas to be 26 issued for such witnesses and the production of such books 27 and papers as either the board or the teacher may designate. 28 The subpoenas shall be signed by the presiding officer of the 29 board. 30 3. In case a witness is duly subpoenaed and refuses to 31 attend, or in case a witness appears and refuses to testify 32 or to produce required books or papers, the board shall, 33 in writing, report such refusal to the district court of 34 the county in which the administrative office of the school 35 -16- LSB 2629XS (2) 91 je/js 16/ 48 S.F. 263 district is located, and the court shall proceed with the 1 person or witness as though the refusal had occurred in a 2 proceeding legally pending before the court. 3 4. The board shall not be bound by common law or statutory 4 rules of evidence or by technical or formal rules of procedure, 5 but it shall hold the hearing in such manner as is best suited 6 to ascertain and conserve the substantial rights of the 7 parties. Process and procedure under sections 279.13 through 8 279.19 shall be as summary as reasonably may be. 9 5. At the conclusion of the private hearing, the 10 superintendent and the teacher may file written briefs and 11 arguments with the board within three days or such other time 12 as may be agreed upon. 13 6. If the teacher fails to timely request a private hearing 14 or does not appear at the private hearing, the board may 15 proceed and make a determination upon the superintendentâs 16 recommendation. If the teacher fails to timely file a request 17 for a private hearing, the determination shall be not later 18 than May 31. If the teacher fails to appear at the private 19 hearing, the determination shall be not later than five days 20 after the scheduled date for the private hearing. The board 21 shall convene in open session and by roll call vote determine 22 the termination or continuance of the teacherâs contract 23 and, if the board votes to continue the teacherâs contract, 24 whether to suspend the teacher with or without pay for a period 25 specified by the board. 26 7. Within five days after the private hearing, the board 27 shall, in executive session, meet to make a final decision 28 upon the recommendation and the evidence as herein provided. 29 The board shall also consider any written brief and arguments 30 submitted by the superintendent and the teacher. 31 8. The record for a private hearing shall include: 32 a. All pleadings, motions and intermediate rulings. 33 b. All evidence received or considered and all other 34 submissions. 35 -17- LSB 2629XS (2) 91 je/js 17/ 48 S.F. 263 c. A statement of all matters officially noticed. 1 d. All questions and offers of proof, objections, and 2 rulings thereon. 3 e. All findings and exceptions. 4 f. Any decision, opinion, or conclusion by the board. 5 g. Findings of fact shall be based solely on the evidence in 6 the record and on matters officially noticed in the record. 7 9. The decision of the board shall be in writing and shall 8 include findings of fact and conclusions of law, separately 9 stated. Findings of fact, if set forth in statutory language, 10 shall be accompanied by a concise and explicit statement of 11 the underlying facts supporting the findings. Each conclusion 12 of law shall be supported by cited authority or by reasoned 13 opinion. 14 10. When the board has reached a decision, opinion, or 15 conclusion, it shall convene in open meeting and by roll 16 call vote determine the continuance or discontinuance of the 17 teacherâs contract and, if the board votes to continue the 18 teacherâs contract, whether to suspend the teacher with or 19 without pay for a period specified by the board. The record 20 of the private conference and findings of fact and exceptions 21 shall be exempt from the provisions of chapter 22 . The 22 secretary of the board shall immediately mail notice of the 23 boardâs action to the teacher. 24 Sec. 34. NEW SECTION . 279.17 Appeal by teacher to 25 adjudicator. 26 1. If the teacher is no longer a probationary teacher, the 27 teacher may, within ten days, appeal the determination of the 28 board to an adjudicator by filing a notice of appeal with the 29 secretary of the board. The notice of appeal shall contain a 30 concise statement of the action which is the subject of the 31 appeal, the particular board action appealed from, the grounds 32 on which relief is sought and the relief sought. 33 2. Within five days following receipt by the secretary 34 of the notice of appeal, the board or the boardâs legal 35 -18- LSB 2629XS (2) 91 je/js 18/ 48 S.F. 263 representative, if any, and the teacher or the teacherâs 1 representative, if any, may select an adjudicator who resides 2 within the boundaries of the merged area in which the school 3 district is located. If an adjudicator cannot be mutually 4 agreed upon within the five-day period, the secretary shall 5 notify the chairperson of the employment appeal board by 6 transmitting the notice of appeal, and the chairperson of 7 the employment appeal board shall within five days provide a 8 list of five adjudicators to the parties. Within three days 9 from receipt of the list of adjudicators, the parties shall 10 select an adjudicator by alternately removing a name from 11 the list until only one name remains. The person whose name 12 remains shall be the adjudicator. The parties shall determine 13 by lot which party shall remove the first name from the list 14 submitted by the chairperson of the employment appeal board. 15 The secretary of the board shall inform the chairperson of 16 the employment appeal board of the name of the adjudicator 17 selected. 18 3. If the teacher does not timely request an appeal to an 19 adjudicator, the decision, opinion, or conclusion of the board 20 shall become final and binding. 21 4. a. Within thirty days after filing the notice of appeal, 22 or within further time allowed by the adjudicator, the board 23 shall transmit to the adjudicator the original or a certified 24 copy of the entire record of the private hearing which may be 25 the subject of the petition. By stipulation of the parties 26 to review the proceedings, the record of the case may be 27 shortened. The adjudicator may require or permit subsequent 28 corrections or additions to the shortened record. 29 b. The record certified and filed by the board shall be the 30 record upon which the appeal shall be heard and no additional 31 evidence shall be heard by the adjudicator. In such appeal to 32 the adjudicator, especially when considering the credibility 33 of witnesses, the adjudicator shall give weight to the fact 34 findings of the board but shall not be bound by them. 35 -19- LSB 2629XS (2) 91 je/js 19/ 48 S.F. 263 5. Before the date set for hearing a petition for review 1 of board action, which shall be within ten days after 2 receipt of the record unless otherwise agreed or unless the 3 adjudicator orders additional evidence be taken before the 4 board, application may be made to the adjudicator for leave to 5 present evidence in addition to that found in the record of the 6 case. If it is shown to the adjudicator that the additional 7 evidence is material and that there were good reasons for 8 failure to present it in the private hearing before the board, 9 the adjudicator may order that the additional evidence be taken 10 before the board upon conditions determined by the adjudicator. 11 The board may modify its findings and decision in the case by 12 reason of the additional evidence and shall file that evidence 13 and any modifications, new findings, or decisions, with the 14 adjudicator and mail copies of the new findings or decisions 15 to the teacher. 16 6. The adjudicator may affirm board action or remand to the 17 board for further proceedings. The adjudicator shall reverse, 18 modify, or grant any appropriate relief from the board action 19 if substantial rights of the teacher have been prejudiced 20 because the board action is any of the following: 21 a. In violation of a board rule or policy or contract. 22 b. Unsupported by a preponderance of the competent evidence 23 in the record made before the board when that record is viewed 24 as a whole. 25 c. Unreasonable, arbitrary, or capricious, or characterized 26 by an abuse of discretion or a clearly unwarranted exercise of 27 discretion. 28 7. The adjudicator shall, within fifteen days after the 29 hearing, make a decision and shall give a copy of the decision 30 to the teacher and the secretary of the board. The decision 31 of the adjudicator shall become the final and binding decision 32 of the board unless either party within ten days notifies the 33 secretary of the board that the decision is rejected. The 34 board may reject the decision by majority roll call vote, in 35 -20- LSB 2629XS (2) 91 je/js 20/ 48 S.F. 263 open meeting, entered into the minutes of the meeting. The 1 board shall immediately notify the teacher of its decision 2 by certified mail. The teacher may reject the adjudicatorâs 3 decision by notifying the boardâs secretary in writing within 4 ten days of the filing of such decision. 5 8. All costs of the adjudicator shall be shared equally by 6 the teacher and the board. 7 Sec. 35. Section 279.18, Code 2025, is amended by striking 8 the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 9 279.18 Appeal by either party to court. 10 1. If either party rejects the adjudicatorâs decision, 11 the rejecting party shall, within thirty days of the initial 12 filing of such decision, appeal to the district court of 13 the county in which the administrative office of the school 14 district is located. The notice of appeal shall be immediately 15 mailed by certified mail to the other party. The adjudicator 16 shall transmit to the reviewing court the original or a 17 certified copy of the entire record which may be the subject 18 of the petition. By stipulation of all parties to the review 19 proceedings, the record of such a case may be shortened. A 20 party unreasonably refusing to stipulate to limit the record 21 may be taxed by the court for the additional cost. The court 22 may require or permit subsequent corrections or additions to 23 the shortened record. 24 2. In proceedings for judicial review of the adjudicatorâs 25 decision, the court shall not hear any further evidence 26 but shall hear the case upon the certified record. In such 27 judicial review, especially when considering the credibility of 28 witnesses, the court shall give weight to the fact findings of 29 the board but shall not be bound by them. The court may affirm 30 the adjudicatorâs decision or remand to the adjudicator or the 31 board for further proceedings upon conditions determined by the 32 court. The court shall reverse, modify, or grant any other 33 appropriate relief from the board decision or the adjudicatorâs 34 decision equitable or legal and including declaratory relief 35 -21- LSB 2629XS (2) 91 je/js 21/ 48 S.F. 263 if substantial rights of the petitioner have been prejudiced 1 because the action is any of the following: 2 a. In violation of constitutional or statutory provisions. 3 b. In excess of the statutory authority of the board or the 4 adjudicator. 5 c. In violation of a board rule or policy or contract. 6 d. Made upon unlawful procedure. 7 e. Affected by other error of law. 8 f. Unsupported by a preponderance of the competent evidence 9 in the record made before the board and the adjudicator when 10 that record is viewed as a whole. 11 g. Unreasonable, arbitrary, or capricious, or characterized 12 by an abuse of discretion or a clearly unwarranted exercise of 13 discretion. 14 3. An aggrieved or adversely affected party to the judicial 15 review proceeding may obtain a review of any final judgment of 16 the district court by appeal to the supreme court. The appeal 17 shall be taken as in other civil cases, although the appeal may 18 be taken regardless of the amount involved. 19 4. For purposes of this section, unless the context 20 otherwise requires, ârejecting partyâ shall include but not be 21 limited to an instructor employed by a community college. 22 Sec. 36. Section 279.19, Code 2025, is amended by striking 23 the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 24 279.19 Probationary period. 25 1. The first three consecutive years of employment of 26 a teacher in the same school district are a probationary 27 period. However, if the teacher has successfully completed a 28 probationary period of employment for another school district 29 located in Iowa, the probationary period in the current 30 district of employment shall not exceed one year. A board of 31 directors may waive the probationary period for any teacher who 32 previously has served a probationary period in another school 33 district and the board may extend the probationary period for 34 an additional year with the consent of the teacher. 35 -22- LSB 2629XS (2) 91 je/js 22/ 48 S.F. 263 2. a. In the case of the termination of a probationary 1 teacherâs contract, the provisions of sections 279.15 and 2 279.16 shall apply. However, if the probationary teacher is a 3 beginning teacher who fails to demonstrate competence in the 4 Iowa teaching standards in accordance with chapter 284, the 5 provisions of sections 279.17 and 279.18 shall also apply. 6 b. The boardâs decision shall be final and binding unless 7 the termination was based upon an alleged violation of a 8 constitutionally guaranteed right of the teacher or an alleged 9 violation of public employee rights of the teacher under 10 section 20.10. 11 3. Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, the 12 grievance procedures of section 20.18 relating to job 13 performance or job retention shall not apply to a teacher 14 during the first two years of the teacherâs probationary 15 period. However, this subsection shall not apply to a teacher 16 who has successfully completed a probationary period in a 17 school district in Iowa. 18 Sec. 37. Section 279.19A, subsections 1, 2, 7, and 8, Code 19 2025, are amended to read as follows: 20 1. School districts employing individuals to coach 21 interscholastic athletic sports shall issue a separate 22 extracurricular contract for each of these sports. An 23 extracurricular contract offered under this section shall be 24 separate from the contract issued under section 279.13 . Wages 25 for employees who coach these sports shall be paid pursuant 26 to established or negotiated supplemental pay schedules. 27 An extracurricular contract shall be in writing, and shall 28 state the number of contract days for that sport, the annual 29 compensation to be paid, and any other matters as may be 30 mutually agreed upon. The contract shall be for a single 31 school year. 32 2. a. An extracurricular contract shall be continued 33 automatically in force and effect for equivalent periods, 34 except as modified or terminated by mutual agreement of 35 -23- LSB 2629XS (2) 91 je/js 23/ 48 S.F. 263 the board of directors and the employee, or terminated in 1 accordance with this section. An extracurricular contract 2 shall initially be offered by the employing board to an 3 individual on the same date that contracts are offered to 4 teachers under section 279.13. An extracurricular contract 5 may be terminated at the end of a school year pursuant to 6 sections 279.15 through 279.19. If the school district offers 7 an extracurricular contract for a sport for the subsequent 8 school year to an employee who is currently performing 9 under an extracurricular contract for that sport, and the 10 employee does not wish to accept the extracurricular contract 11 for the subsequent year, the employee may resign from the 12 extracurricular contract within twenty-one days after it has 13 been received. 14 b. If the provisions of an extracurricular contract executed 15 under this section conflict with a collective bargaining 16 agreement negotiated under chapter 20 and effective when the 17 extracurricular contract is executed or renewed, the provisions 18 of the collective bargaining agreement shall prevail Section 19 279.13, subsection 3, applies to this section . 20 7. An extracurricular contract may be terminated prior to 21 the expiration of that contract for any lawful reason following 22 an informal, private hearing before the board of directors 23 pursuant to section 279.27 . The decision of the board to 24 terminate an extracurricular contract shall be final. 25 8. a. A termination proceeding regarding an extracurricular 26 contract shall either by the board pursuant to subsection 2 or 27 pursuant to section 279.27 does not affect a contract issued 28 pursuant to section 279.13 . 29 b. A termination of a contract entered into pursuant to 30 section 279.13 , or a resignation from that contract by the 31 teacher, constitutes an automatic termination or resignation of 32 the extracurricular contract in effect between the same teacher 33 and the employing school board. 34 Sec. 38. Section 279.23, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code 35 -24- LSB 2629XS (2) 91 je/js 24/ 48 S.F. 263 2025, is amended to read as follows: 1 c. The rate of compensation per week of five consecutive 2 days or per month of four consecutive weeks . 3 Sec. 39. Section 279.23, subsection 5, Code 2025, is amended 4 to read as follows: 5 5. Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section , 6 a temporary contract may be issued to an administrator for 7 up to nine months. Notwithstanding the other provisions of 8 this section , a temporary contract may also be issued to 9 an administrator to fill a vacancy created by a leave of 10 absence in accordance with the provisions of section 29A.28 , 11 which contract shall automatically terminate upon return from 12 military leave of the former incumbent of the administrator 13 position . Temporary contracts and which contract shall not be 14 subject to the provisions of sections 279.24 and 279.25 . 15 Sec. 40. Section 279.24, subsections 2 and 4, Code 2025, are 16 amended to read as follows: 17 2. If the board of directors is considering termination of 18 an administratorâs contract, prior to any formal action, the 19 board may arrange to meet in closed session, in accordance with 20 the provisions of section 21.5 , with the administrator and the 21 administratorâs representative. The board shall review the 22 administratorâs evaluation, review the reasons for nonrenewal, 23 and give the administrator an opportunity to respond. If, 24 following the closed session, the board of directors and the 25 administrator are unable to mutually agree to a modification 26 or termination of the administratorâs contract, or the board 27 of directors may issue and the administrator are unable to 28 mutually agree to enter into a one-year , nonrenewable contract , 29 to the administrator. If the board of directors decides to 30 terminate the administratorâs contract, the board shall follow 31 the procedures in this section . 32 4. Administrators employed in a school district for 33 less than three two consecutive years are probationary 34 administrators. However, a school board may waive the 35 -25- LSB 2629XS (2) 91 je/js 25/ 48 S.F. 263 probationary period for any administrator who has previously 1 served a probationary period in another school district and 2 the school board may extend the probationary period for an 3 additional year with the consent of the administrator. If a 4 school board determines that it should terminate a probationary 5 administratorâs contract, the school board shall notify the 6 administrator not later than May 15 that the contract will not 7 be renewed beyond the current year. The notice shall be in 8 writing by letter, personally delivered, or mailed by certified 9 mail. The notification shall be complete when received by the 10 administrator. Within ten days after receiving the notice, the 11 administrator may request a private conference with the school 12 board to discuss the reasons for termination. The school 13 boardâs decision to terminate a probationary administratorâs 14 contract shall be final unless the termination was based upon 15 an alleged violation of a constitutionally guaranteed right of 16 the administrator. 17 Sec. 41. Section 279.24, subsection 5, paragraphs c, d, e, 18 f, g, and h, Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 19 c. Within five days after receipt of the written notice 20 that the school board has voted to consider termination of 21 the contract, the administrator may request a private hearing 22 in writing to the secretary of the school board . The board 23 shall then forward that the notification be forwarded to the 24 board of educational examiners along with a request that the 25 board of educational examiners submit a list of five qualified 26 administrative law judges who are employed by the division 27 of administrative hearings created by section 10A.801 to the 28 parties. Within three days from receipt of the list the 29 parties shall select an administrative law judge by alternately 30 removing a name from the list until only one name remains. 31 The person whose name remains shall be the administrative law 32 judge. The parties shall determine by lot which party shall 33 remove the first name from the list. The private hearing shall 34 be held no sooner than twenty ten days and not later than forty 35 -26- LSB 2629XS (2) 91 je/js 26/ 48 S.F. 263 thirty days following the administratorâs request unless the 1 parties otherwise agree. If the administrator does not request 2 a private hearing, the school board, not later than May 31, may 3 determine the continuance or discontinuance of the contract 4 and, if the board determines to continue the administratorâs 5 contract, whether to suspend the administrator with or without 6 pay for a period specified by the board. School board action 7 shall be by majority roll call vote entered on the minutes of 8 the meeting. Notice of school board action shall be personally 9 delivered or mailed to the administrator. 10 d. The administrative law judge selected shall notify 11 the secretary of the school board and the administrator in 12 writing concerning the date, time, and location of the private 13 hearing. The school board may be represented by a legal 14 representative, if any, and the administrator shall appear and 15 may be represented by counsel or by representative, if any. 16 Any witnesses for the parties at the private hearing shall be 17 sequestered. A transcript or recording shall be made of the 18 proceedings at the private hearing. A school board member or 19 administrator is not liable for any damage to an administrator 20 or school board member if a statement made at the private 21 hearing is determined to be erroneous as long as the statement 22 was made in good faith. 23 e. The administrative law judge shall, within ten days 24 following the date of the private hearing, make a proposed 25 decision as to whether or not the administrator should be 26 dismissed, and shall give a copy of the proposed decision to 27 the administrator and the school board. Findings of fact shall 28 be prepared by the administrative law judge. The proposed 29 decision of the administrative law judge shall become the final 30 decision of the school board unless within thirty ten days 31 after the filing of the decision the administrator files a 32 written notice of appeal with the school board, or the school 33 board on its own motion determines to review the decision. 34 f. If the administrator appeals to the school board, or if 35 -27- LSB 2629XS (2) 91 je/js 27/ 48 S.F. 263 the school board determines on its own motion to review the 1 proposed decision of the administrative law judge, a private 2 hearing shall be held before the school board within ten five 3 days after the petition for review, or motion for review, has 4 been made or at such other time as the parties agree. The 5 private hearing is not subject to chapter 21 . The school board 6 may hear the case de novo upon the record as submitted before 7 the administrative law judge. In cases where there is an 8 appeal from a proposed decision or where a proposed decision 9 is reviewed on motion of the school board, an opportunity 10 shall be afforded to each party to file exceptions, present 11 briefs, and present oral arguments to the school board which 12 is to render the final decision. The secretary of the school 13 board shall give the administrator written notice of the time, 14 place, and date of the private hearing. The school board shall 15 meet within five days after the private hearing to determine 16 the question of continuance or discontinuance of the contract 17 and, if the board determines to continue the administratorâs 18 contract, whether to suspend the administrator with or 19 without pay for a period specified by the board or issue the 20 administrator a one-year, nonrenewable contract . The school 21 board shall make findings of fact which shall be based solely 22 on the evidence in the record and on matters officially noticed 23 in the record. 24 g. The decision of the school board shall be in writing 25 and shall include findings of fact and conclusions of law, 26 separately stated . Findings of fact, if set forth in statutory 27 language, shall be accompanied by a concise and explicit 28 statement of the underlying facts supporting the findings. 29 Each conclusion of law shall be supported by cited authority 30 or by reasoned opinion. 31 h. When the school board has reached a decision, opinion, 32 or conclusion, it shall convene in open meeting and by roll 33 call vote determine the continuance or discontinuance of 34 the administratorâs contract and, if the board votes to 35 -28- LSB 2629XS (2) 91 je/js 28/ 48 S.F. 263 continue the administratorâs contract, whether to suspend the 1 administrator with or without pay for a period specified by 2 the board or issue the administrator a one-year, nonrenewable 3 contract . The record of the private hearing conference and 4 written decision of the board findings of fact and exceptions 5 shall be exempt from the provisions of chapter 22 . The 6 secretary of the school board shall immediately personally 7 deliver or mail notice of the school boardâs action to the 8 administrator. 9 Sec. 42. Section 279.27, Code 2025, is amended to read as 10 follows: 11 279.27 Discharge of teacher. 12 1. A teacher may be discharged at any time during the 13 contract year for just cause. The superintendent or the 14 superintendentâs designee, shall notify the teacher immediately 15 that the superintendent will recommend in writing to the board 16 at a regular or special meeting of the board held not more 17 than fifteen days after notification has been given to the 18 teacher that the teacherâs continuing contract be terminated 19 effective immediately following a decision of the board. 20 The procedure for dismissal shall be as provided in section 21 279.15, subsection 2 , and sections 279.16 through 279.19 . The 22 superintendent may suspend a teacher under this section pending 23 hearing and determination by the board. 24 2. For purposes of this section , âjust causeâ includes 25 but is not limited to a violation of the code of professional 26 conduct and ethics of the board of educational examiners if 27 the board has taken disciplinary action against a teacher, 28 during the six months following issuance by the board of a 29 final written decision and finding of fact after a disciplinary 30 proceeding. 31 Sec. 43. Section 284.3, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 32 to read as follows: 33 2. A school board shall provide for the following: 34 a. For purposes of comprehensive evaluations, standards 35 -29- LSB 2629XS (2) 91 je/js 29/ 48 S.F. 263 and criteria which measure a beginning teacherâs performance 1 against the Iowa teaching standards specified in subsection 1 , 2 and the criteria for the Iowa teaching standards developed by 3 the department in accordance with section 256.9 , to determine 4 whether the teacherâs practice meets the requirements specified 5 for a career teacher. These standards and criteria shall be 6 set forth in an instrument provided by the department. The 7 comprehensive evaluation and instrument are not subject to 8 negotiations or grievance procedures pursuant to chapter 20 or 9 determinations made by the board of directors under section 10 279.14 . A local school board and its certified bargaining 11 representative may negotiate, pursuant to chapter 20, 12 evaluation and grievance procedures for beginning teachers that 13 are not in conflict with this chapter. If, in accordance with 14 section 279.19, a beginning teacher appeals the determination 15 of a school board to an adjudicator under section 279.17, 16 the adjudicator selected shall have successfully completed 17 training related to the Iowa teacher standards, the criteria 18 adopted by the state board in accordance with subsection 3, and 19 any additional training required under rules adopted by the 20 employment appeal board in cooperation with the state board. 21 b. For purposes of performance reviews for teachers other 22 than beginning teachers, evaluations that contain, at a 23 minimum, the Iowa teaching standards specified in subsection 24 1 , as well as the criteria for the Iowa teaching standards 25 developed by the department in accordance with section 26 256.9, subsection 42 . A local school board and its certified 27 bargaining representative may negotiate, pursuant to chapter 28 20, additional teaching standards and criteria. A local 29 school board and its certified bargaining representative shall 30 negotiate, pursuant to chapter 20, evaluation and grievance 31 procedures for teachers other than beginning teachers that are 32 not in conflict with this chapter. 33 Sec. 44. Section 284.4, subsection 1, paragraph b, 34 subparagraphs (2) and (5), Code 2025, are amended to read as 35 -30- LSB 2629XS (2) 91 je/js 30/ 48 S.F. 263 follows: 1 (2) Monitor the evaluation requirements of this chapter 2 to ensure evaluations are conducted in a fair and consistent 3 manner throughout the school district or agency. The In 4 addition to any negotiated evaluation procedures, the committee 5 shall develop model evidence for the Iowa teaching standards 6 and criteria. The model evidence will minimize paperwork 7 and focus on teacher improvement. The model evidence will 8 determine which standards and criteria can be met with 9 observation and which evidence meets multiple standards and 10 criteria. 11 (5) Determine Ensure the agreement negotiated pursuant to 12 chapter 20 determines the compensation for teachers on the 13 committee for work responsibilities required beyond the normal 14 work day. 15 Sec. 45. Section 284.8, subsections 2 and 3, Code 2025, are 16 amended to read as follows: 17 2. If a supervisor or an evaluator determines, at any time, 18 as a result of a teacherâs performance that the teacher is not 19 meeting district expectations under the Iowa teaching standards 20 specified in section 284.3, subsection 1 , paragraphs âaâ 21 through âhâ , and the criteria for the Iowa teaching standards 22 developed by the department in accordance with section 256.9, 23 subsection 42 , and any other standards or criteria established 24 in the collective bargaining agreement, the evaluator shall, 25 at the direction of the teacherâs supervisor, recommend to 26 the district that the teacher participate in an intensive 27 assistance program. The intensive assistance program and its 28 implementation are not subject to negotiation and grievance 29 procedures established pursuant to chapter 20 . All school 30 districts shall be prepared to offer an intensive assistance 31 program. 32 3. A teacher who is not meeting the applicable standards and 33 criteria based on a determination made pursuant to subsection 2 34 shall participate in an intensive assistance program. However, 35 -31- LSB 2629XS (2) 91 je/js 31/ 48 S.F. 263 a teacher who has previously participated in an intensive 1 assistance program relating to particular Iowa teaching 2 standards or criteria shall not be entitled to participate 3 in another intensive assistance program relating to the same 4 standards or criteria and shall be subject to the provisions of 5 subsection 4 . 6 Sec. 46. Section 284.8, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended 7 by striking the subsection. 8 Sec. 47. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 9 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 10 Sec. 48. APPLICABILITY. This division of this Act applies 11 to employment contracts of school employees entered into 12 pursuant to chapter 279 on and after the effective date of 13 this division of this Act. This division of this Act does 14 not apply to collective bargaining agreements which have been 15 ratified in a ratification election referred to in section 16 20.17, subsection 4, for which an arbitrator has made a final 17 determination as described in section 20.22, subsection 11, 18 or which have become effective, when such events occurred 19 before the effective date of this division of this Act. This 20 division of this Act applies to all collective bargaining 21 procedures provided for in chapter 20 occurring on and after 22 the effective date of this division of this Act and collective 23 bargaining agreements pursuant to chapter 20 for which a 24 ratification election referred to in section 20.17, subsection 25 4, is held, for which an arbitrator makes a final determination 26 as described in section 20.22, subsection 11, or which become 27 effective on or after the effective date of this division of 28 this Act. 29 DIVISION III 30 CITY CIVIL SERVICE REQUIREMENTS 31 Sec. 49. Section 400.12, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended 32 by striking the subsection. 33 Sec. 50. Section 400.17, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended 34 to read as follows: 35 -32- LSB 2629XS (2) 91 je/js 32/ 48 S.F. 263 4. A person shall not be appointed, denied appointment, 1 promoted, removed, discharged, suspended, or demoted to or 2 from a civil service position or in any other way favored or 3 discriminated against in that position because of political 4 or religious opinions or affiliations, race, national origin, 5 sex, or age, or in retaliation for the exercise of any right 6 enumerated in this chapter . However, the maximum age for a 7 police officer or fire fighter covered by this chapter and 8 employed for police duty or the duty of fighting fires is 9 sixty-five years of age. 10 Sec. 51. Section 400.18, Code 2025, is amended by striking 11 the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 12 400.18 Removal, demotion, or suspension. 13 1. A person holding civil service rights as provided in 14 this chapter shall not be removed, demoted, or suspended 15 arbitrarily, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, but 16 may be removed, demoted, or suspended after a hearing by a 17 majority vote of the civil service commission, for neglect of 18 duty, disobedience, misconduct, or failure to properly perform 19 the personâs duties. 20 2. The party alleging neglect of duty, disobedience, 21 misconduct, or failure to properly perform a duty shall have 22 the burden of proof. 23 3. A person subject to a hearing has the right to be 24 represented by counsel at the personâs expense or by the 25 personâs authorized collective bargaining representative. 26 Sec. 52. Section 400.19, Code 2025, is amended to read as 27 follows: 28 400.19 Removal , or discharge , demotion, or suspension of 29 subordinates. 30 The person having the appointing power as provided in 31 this chapter , or the chief of police or chief of the fire 32 department, may , upon presentation of grounds for such action 33 to the subordinate in writing, peremptorily remove, discharge, 34 demote, or suspend , demote, or discharge a subordinate then 35 -33- LSB 2629XS (2) 91 je/js 33/ 48 S.F. 263 under the personâs or chiefâs direction due to any act or 1 failure to act by the employee that is in contravention of law, 2 city policies, or standard operating procedures, or that in 3 the judgment of the person or chief is sufficient to show that 4 the employee is unsuitable or unfit for employment for neglect 5 of duty, disobedience of orders, misconduct, or failure to 6 properly perform the subordinateâs duties . 7 Sec. 53. Section 400.20, Code 2025, is amended to read as 8 follows: 9 400.20 Appeal. 10 The removal, discharge suspension , demotion, or suspension 11 discharge of a person holding civil service rights may be 12 appealed to the civil service commission within fourteen 13 calendar days after the removal, discharge suspension , 14 demotion, or suspension discharge . 15 Sec. 54. Section 400.21, Code 2025, is amended to read as 16 follows: 17 400.21 Notice of appeal. 18 If the appeal be taken by the person removed, discharged 19 suspended , demoted, or suspended discharged , notice of the 20 appeal, signed by the appellant and specifying the ruling 21 appealed from, shall be filed with the clerk of the commission. 22 If the appeal is taken by the person making such removal, 23 discharge suspension , demotion, or suspension discharge , such 24 notice shall also be served upon the person removed, discharged 25 suspended , demoted, or suspended discharged . 26 Sec. 55. Section 400.22, Code 2025, is amended to read as 27 follows: 28 400.22 Charges. 29 Within fourteen calendar days from the service of the notice 30 of appeal, the person or body making the ruling appealed 31 from shall file with the body to which the appeal is taken a 32 written specification of the charges and grounds upon which the 33 ruling was based. If the charges are not filed, the person 34 removed, suspended or discharged , demoted, or suspended may 35 -34- LSB 2629XS (2) 91 je/js 34/ 48 S.F. 263 present the matter to the body to whom the appeal is to be 1 taken by affidavit, setting forth the facts, and the body to 2 whom the appeal is to be taken shall immediately enter an 3 order reinstating the person removed, suspended or discharged , 4 demoted, or suspended for want of prosecution. 5 Sec. 56. Section 400.27, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 6 to read as follows: 7 3. The city or any civil service employee shall have a 8 right to appeal to the district court from the final ruling or 9 decision of the civil service commission. The appeal shall be 10 taken within thirty days from the filing of the formal decision 11 of the commission. The district court of the county in which 12 the city is located shall have full jurisdiction of the appeal. 13 The scope of review for the appeal shall be limited to de novo 14 appellate review without a trial or additional evidence The 15 appeal shall be a trial de novo as an equitable action in the 16 district court . 17 Sec. 57. Section 400.28, Code 2025, is amended by striking 18 the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 19 400.28 Employees ââ number diminished. 20 1. When the public interest requires a diminution of 21 employees in a classification or grade under civil service, 22 the city council, acting in good faith, may do either of the 23 following: 24 a. Abolish the office and remove the employee from the 25 employeeâs classification or grade thereunder. 26 b. Reduce the number of employees in any classification or 27 grade by suspending the necessary number. 28 2. In case it becomes necessary to remove or suspend any 29 such employees, the persons so removed or suspended shall 30 be those having seniority of the shortest duration in the 31 classifications or grades affected, and such seniority shall be 32 computed as provided in section 400.12 for all persons holding 33 seniority in the classification or grade affected, regardless 34 of their seniority in any other classification or grade, but 35 -35- LSB 2629XS (2) 91 je/js 35/ 48 S.F. 263 any such employee so removed from any classification or grade 1 shall revert to the employeeâs seniority in the next lower 2 grade or classification; if such seniority is equal, then the 3 one less efficient and competent as determined by the person or 4 body having the appointing power shall be the one affected. 5 3. In case of removal or suspension, the civil service 6 commission shall issue to each person affected one certificate 7 showing the personâs comparative seniority or length of service 8 in each of the classifications or grades from which the person 9 is so removed and the fact that the person has been honorably 10 removed. The certificate shall also list each classification 11 or grade in which the person was previously employed. The 12 personâs name shall be carried for a period of not less than 13 three years after the suspension or removal on a preferred list 14 and appointments or promotions made during that period to the 15 personâs former duties in the classification or grade shall 16 be made in the order of greater seniority from the preferred 17 lists. 18 Sec. 58. SENIORITY RIGHTS REESTABLISHED. The seniority 19 rights of any civil service employee extinguished pursuant to 20 section 400.12, subsection 4, on or after February 17, 2017, 21 are hereby reestablished, including accrual of seniority during 22 the period of extinguishment. 23 Sec. 59. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 24 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 25 Sec. 60. APPLICABILITY. This division of this Act applies 26 to employment actions taken on or after the effective date of 27 this division of this Act. 28